California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(a) (1) “Covered establishment” includes a grocery establishment or a pharmacy establishment.

(A) “Grocery establishment” means a retail store operating in this state that meets both of the following requirements:

(i) The retail store sells primarily household foodstuffs for offsite consumption, including, but not limited to, the sale of fresh produce, meats, poultry, fish, deli
 products, dairy products, canned foods, dry foods, beverages, baked foods, or prepared foods.

(ii) The sale of any other household supplies or other products by the retail store is secondary to the primary purpose of food sales.

(B) “Pharmacy establishment” means a pharmacy as defined in Section 4037 that meets all of the following requirements:

(i) The pharmacy is a chain community pharmacy or an independent community pharmacy as defined in Section 4001.

(ii) The pharmacy is open to the public.

(iii) The pharmacy is not owned by a health facility as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety
 Code.

(iv) The pharmacy is not a part of a fully integrated delivery system. For purposes of this clause, a “fully integrated delivery system” means a system that includes a physician organization, health facility or health system, and a nonprofit health care service plan that provides health care services to enrollees in a specific geographic region of the state through an affiliate hospital system and an exclusive contract between the nonprofit health care service plan and a single physician organization in each geographic region to provide those medical services.

(2) Nothing in clause (iii) or (iv) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) shall be construed as exempting a chain community pharmacy as defined in Section 4001 from this chapter. However, a pharmacy location owned and
 operated by a physician organization, health facility or health system, and a nonprofit health care service plan that is part of a fully integrated delivery system is not a store as described in Section 4001.

(b) “Closure” means the cessation or substantial cessation of industrial or commercial operations by a covered establishment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 625, Sec. 2.   (SB 1089)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

22949.92.1.

(a) A covered establishment shall, no later than 45 days before a closure of the covered establishment takes effect, perform all of the following acts:

(1) (A) Provide written notice of the closure to all of the following persons or entities:

(i) (I) The employees of the covered establishment affected by the closure and their authorized representatives if the covered establishment employs more than five employees.

(II) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subdivision, a covered establishment that employs five or fewer employees shall, no later than 30 days before a closure of the covered establishment takes effect, provide written notice of the closure to the employees of the covered establishment affected by the closure.

(ii) The Employment Development Department.

(iii) The State Department of Social Services.

(iv) The local workforce development board of any city and county government
 within which the closure occurs.

(v) The chief elected official of each city and county government within which the closure occurs.

(vi) The California State Board of Pharmacy, if the covered establishment is a pharmacy establishment.

(B) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subdivision, a covered establishment that is a pharmacy as defined in Section 4037, is owned by a person or entity who owns 15 or fewer pharmacies nationwide, and is not a covered establishment as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1400.5 of the
 Labor Code shall not be required to provide written notice pursuant to subparagraph (A) to any of the following persons or entities:

(i) The Employment Development Department.

(ii) The State Department of Social Services.

(iii) The local workforce development board of any city and county government within which the covered establishment is located.

(iv) The chief elected official of each city and county government within which the covered establishment is located.

(C) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subdivision, a covered establishment that is a grocery establishment as defined in
 subdivision (a) of Section 22949.92, is owned by a person or entity who owns 15 or fewer grocery establishments nationwide, and is not a covered establishment as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1400.5 of the Labor Code shall not be required to provide written notice pursuant to subparagraph (A) to any of the following persons or entities:

(i) The Employment Development Department.

(ii) The local workforce development board of any city and county government within which the covered establishment is located.

(iii) The chief elected official of each city and county government within which the covered establishment is located. 

(D) Notwithstanding
 any other provision of this subdivision, a covered establishment that is also a covered establishment as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1400.5 of the Labor Code shall only be considered in compliance with the requirements of clauses (ii), (iv), and (v) of subparagraph (A) if the covered establishment provides a written notice as required and pursuant to the timeframe specified in Section 1401 of the Labor Code.

(2) (A) Post a written notice of the closure in a conspicuous location at the entrance to the covered establishment’s premises that includes the planned closure date of the covered establishment.

(B) If the covered establishment is a pharmacy establishment regardless of the number of employees, the written notice described in subparagraph (A) shall also include both of the following:

(i) The name, address, and contact information of the pharmacy establishment where any prescriptions will be transferred.

(ii) The phone number, email address, or internet website where
 patients may obtain information regarding the process of transferring the prescription to a pharmacy establishment of the patient’s choosing.

(3) Take reasonable steps to provide a written notice of the closure in at least one form other than the forms described in paragraphs (1) and (2) that is in a form in which the covered establishment regularly communicates or advertises to its consumers, if the covered establishment is a grocery establishment, or to its patients, if the
 covered establishment is a pharmacy establishment.

(b) Except as otherwise required under Section 1401 of the Labor Code or any other provision of the law, a covered establishment shall not be required to provide notice pursuant to this section if either of the following circumstances applies:

(1) A closure is necessitated by a physical calamity or act of war.

(2) The closure is caused by business circumstances that were not reasonably foreseeable at the time that notice would have been required. 

(c) (1) A covered establishment that violates this section shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand
 dollars ($10,000) for each closure, to be assessed and collected in a civil action brought by any person injured by the violation or in a civil action brought in the name of the people of the State of California by the Attorney General, a district attorney, or a city attorney where the covered establishment was located.

(A) In assessing the amount of the civil penalty, the court shall consider relevant circumstances presented by the parties to the case, including, but not limited to, the following circumstances:

(i) The nature and severity of the misconduct.

(ii) The number of violations.

(iii) The length of time over which the misconduct occurred, and the
 persistence of the misconduct.

(iv) The willfulness of the misconduct.

(v) The defendant’s assets, liabilities, and net worth.

(vi) The number of employees employed by the defendant.

(B) (i) If the Attorney General brings the action, one-half of the civil penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered, and one-half shall be paid to the General Fund.

(ii) If a district attorney brings the action, the civil penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered.

(iii) If a city attorney brings the action, one-half of the civil penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the city in which the judgment was entered, and one-half shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered.

(C) The court shall grant a prevailing plaintiff reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.

(2) (A) An employee that does not receive written notice by a covered establishment in violation of this section is entitled to recover in a civil action an additional sum payable as liquidated damages in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) per employee for
 each day the rights of an employee under this section are violated and continuing until the violation is cured.

(B) An employee shall only be entitled to either recover the liquidated damages provided for in this paragraph or to enforce a civil penalty as set forth in Section 1403 of the Labor Code, but not both, for the same violation.

(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subdivision, a person shall have no right to bring a private cause of action against a covered establishment for a violation of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).

(d) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), this section does not preempt or alter any other rights or remedies, including any causes of action, available under any other federal or state law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 625, Sec. 2.   (SB 1089)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

22949.92.2.

(a) (1) After receiving a written notice described in Section 22949.92.1 from a covered establishment, the county in which that covered establishment is located shall provide the local workforce development board of the county in which the covered establishment is located with information about safety net programs, including, but not limited to, unemployment insurance, the CalWORKs program, the CalFresh program, and the Medi-Cal program. The local workforce development board of the county in which that covered establishment is located shall provide the covered establishment with information
 about safety net programs and the availability of local workforce training services.

(2) A covered establishment that receives information from a county or a local workforce development board pursuant to paragraph (1) shall, no later than 30 days before a closure of the covered establishment takes effect, provide any information that it receives from the county and local workforce development board to each employee of the covered establishment.

(b) After receiving a written notice described in Section 22949.92.1 from a grocery establishment, the State Department of Social Services shall
 transmit to the Food and Nutrition Service of the United States Department of Agriculture information stating that the grocery establishment is closing and the closure date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 625, Sec. 2.   (SB 1089)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 8.5. STOP TOBACCO ACCESS TO KIDS ENFORCEMENT ACT [22950. - 22964.]

22950.

This Division shall be known and may be referred to as the Stop Tobacco Access to Kids Enforcement Act or the STAKE Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1009, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

22950.5.

For purposes of this division, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Department” means the State Department of Public Health.

(b) “Enforcing agency” means the State Department of Public Health, another state agency, including, but not limited to, the office of the Attorney General, or a local law enforcement agency, including, but not limited to, a city attorney, district attorney, or county counsel.

(c) “Smoking” means inhaling, exhaling, burning, or carrying any lighted or heated cigar, cigarette, or pipe, or any other lighted or heated tobacco or plant
 product intended for inhalation, whether natural or synthetic, in any manner or in any form. “Smoking” includes the use of an electronic smoking device that creates an aerosol or vapor, in any manner or in any form, or the use of any oral smoking device for the purpose of circumventing the prohibition of smoking.

(d) (1) “Tobacco product” means any of the following:

(A) A product containing, made, or derived from tobacco or nicotine that is intended for human consumption, whether smoked, heated, chewed, absorbed, dissolved, inhaled, snorted, sniffed, or ingested by any other means, including, but not limited to, cigarettes, cigars, little cigars, chewing tobacco, pipe tobacco, or snuff.

(B) An electronic device that delivers nicotine or other vaporized liquids to the person inhaling from the
 device, including, but not limited to, an electronic cigarette, cigar, pipe, or hookah.

(C) Any component, part, or accessory of a tobacco product, whether or not sold separately.

(2) “Tobacco product” does not include a product that has been approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for sale as a tobacco cessation product or for other therapeutic purposes where the product is marketed and sold solely for such an approved purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 7, Sec. 1.   (SB 5 2x)   Effective June 9, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

22951.

The Legislature finds and declares that reducing and eventually eliminating the illegal purchase and consumption of tobacco products by any person under 21 years of age is critical to ensuring the long-term health of our state’s citizens. Accordingly, California must fully comply with federal regulations, particularly the “Synar Amendment,” that restrict tobacco sales to minors and require states to vigorously enforce their laws prohibiting the sale and distribution of tobacco products to persons under 18 years of age. Full compliance and vigorous enforcement of the “Synar Amendment” requires the collaboration of multiple state and local agencies that license, inspect, or otherwise conduct business with retailers, distributors, or wholesalers that sell
 tobacco.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 8, Sec. 2.   (SB 7 2x)   Effective June 9, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

22952.

The State Department of Public Health shall do all of the following:

(a) Establish and develop a program to reduce the availability of tobacco products to persons under 21 years of age through the enforcement activities authorized by this division.

(b) Establish requirements that retailers of tobacco products post conspicuously, at each point of purchase, a notice stating that selling tobacco products to anyone under 21 years of age is illegal and subject to penalties. The notice shall also state that the law requires that all persons selling tobacco products check the identification of a purchaser of tobacco products who reasonably appears
 to be under 21 years of age. The warning signs shall include a toll-free telephone number to the department for persons to report unlawful sales of tobacco products to any person under 21 years of age.

(c) Provide that primary responsibility for enforcement of this division shall be with the department. In carrying out its enforcement responsibilities, the department shall conduct random, onsite sting inspections at retail sites and shall enlist the assistance of persons that are under 21 years of age in conducting these enforcement activities. The department may conduct onsite sting inspections in response to public complaints or at retail sites where violations have previously occurred, and investigate illegal sales of tobacco products to any person under 21 years of age by telephone, mail, or the Internet. A person under 21 years of age who participates in these enforcement activities is immune from prosecution under any provision of law
 prohibiting the purchase of these products by a person under 21 years of age.

(d) In accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall adopt and publish guidelines for the use of persons under 21 years of age in inspections conducted pursuant to subdivision (c) that shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) An enforcing agency may use persons under 21 years of age in random inspections to determine if sales of cigarettes or other tobacco products are being made to persons under 21 years of age.

(2) A photograph or video recording of the person under 21 years of age shall be taken prior to each inspection or shift of inspections and retained by the enforcing agency for purposes of verifying appearances.

(3) An enforcing agency may use video recording equipment when conducting the inspections to record and document illegal sales or attempted sales.

(4) The person under 21 years of age, if questioned about his or her age, need not state his or her actual age but shall present a true and correct identification if verbally asked to present it. Any failure on the part of the person under 21 years of age to provide true and correct identification, if verbally asked for it, shall be a defense to an action pursuant to this section.

(5) The person under 21 years of age shall be under the supervision of a regularly employed peace officer during the inspection.

(6) All persons under 21 years of age used in this manner by an enforcing agency shall display the
 appearance of a person under 21 years of age. It shall be a defense to an action under this division that the person’s appearance was not that which could be generally expected of a person under 21 years of age, under the actual circumstances presented to the seller of the cigarettes or other tobacco products at the time of the alleged offense.

(7) Following the completion of the sale, the peace officer accompanying the person under 21 years of age shall reenter the retail establishment and shall inform the seller of the random inspection. Following an attempted sale, the enforcing agency shall notify the retail establishment of the inspection.

(8) Failure to comply with the procedures set forth in this subdivision shall be a defense to an action brought pursuant to this section.

(e) Be responsible for ensuring and
 reporting the state’s compliance with Section 1926 of Title XIX of the federal Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300x-26) and any implementing regulations adopted in relation thereto by the United States Department of Health and Human Services. A copy of this report shall be made available to the Governor and the Legislature.

(f) Provide that any civil penalties imposed pursuant to Section 22958 shall be enforced against the owner or owners of the retail business and not the employees of the business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 8, Sec. 3.   (SB 7 2x)   Effective June 9, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

22953.

All moneys collected as civil penalties by the department and other state agencies pursuant to this division shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Sale of Tobacco to Minors Control Account that is hereby established.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 653, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

22954.

(a) Any cigarette or tobacco products distributor or wholesaler as defined in Sections 30011 and 30016 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, and licensed under Article 1 (commencing with Section 30140) of Chapter 3 of Part 13 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code or Article 3 (commencing with Section 30155) of Chapter 3 of Part 13 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, and any cigarette vending machine operator granted a seller’s permit under the Sales and Use Tax Law (Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code), shall annually provide to the State Department of Health
 Services, the names and addresses of those persons to whom they provide tobacco products, including, but not limited to, dealers as defined in Section 30012 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, for the purpose of identifying retailers of tobacco to ensure compliance with this division.

 (b) Cigarette vending machine operators granted a seller’s permit under the Sales and Use Tax Law (Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code), shall annually provide to the department their name and the address of each location where cigarette vending machines are placed, in order to ensure compliance with this division.

 (c) The data provided, pursuant to this section, shall be deemed confidential official information by the department and shall
 be exempt from disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 36.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Section 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

22955.

Agents of the state department, while conducting enforcement activities pursuant to this division, are peace officers and are subject to all of the powers and immunities granted to Food and Drug Section inspectors pursuant to Section 106500 of the Health and Safety Code in the same manner as are any Food and Drug Section inspectors of the state department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 24.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

22956.

All persons engaging in the retail sale of tobacco products shall check the identification of tobacco purchasers, to establish the age of the purchaser, if the purchaser reasonably appears to be under 21 years of age.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 8, Sec. 4.   (SB 7 2x)   Effective June 9, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

22957.

(a) In addition to the primary enforcement responsibility assumed by the department, another enforcing agency may conduct inspections and assess penalties for violations of this division if the enforcing agency complies with this division and with all applicable laws and guidelines developed pursuant to this division.

(b) State and local enforcement agencies are encouraged, in order to avoid duplication, to share the results of inspections and coordinate with the department when enforcing this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 653, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

22958.

(a) An enforcing agency may assess civil penalties against any person, firm, or corporation that sells, gives, or in any way furnishes to another person who is under 21 years of age any tobacco, cigarette, cigarette papers, any other instrument or paraphernalia that is designed for the smoking or ingestion of tobacco, tobacco products, or any controlled substance, according to the following schedule:

(1) A civil penalty of one thousand dollars ($1,000) to one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) for the first violation.

(2) A civil penalty of two thousand dollars ($2,000) to three thousand dollars ($3,000) for the second
 violation at the same location within a five-year period.

(3) A civil penalty of five thousand dollars ($5,000) to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for the third violation at the same location within a five-year period.

(4) A civil penalty of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) to twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for a fourth violation within a five-year period.

(5) A civil penalty of at least twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for five or more violations within a five-year period.

(b) (1) In addition to the civil penalties described in subdivision (a), upon the assessment of a civil penalty for the third, fourth, or fifth violation, the
 department, within 60 days of the date of service of the final administrative adjudication on the parties or payment of the civil penalty for an uncontested violation, shall notify the State Board of Equalization of the violation. The State Board of Equalization shall then assess a civil penalty of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) and suspend or revoke a license issued pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 22971.7) of Division 8.6 in accordance with the following schedule:

(A) A 45-day suspension of the license for a third violation at the same location within a five-year period.

(B) A 90-day suspension of the license for a fourth violation at
 the same location within a five-year period.

(C) Revocation of the license for a fifth violation at the same location within a five-year period.

(2) The provisions of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 55121) of Part 30 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code apply with respect to the collection of the penalty imposed by the State Board of Equalization pursuant to paragraph (1).

(c) (1) For each suspension or revocation pursuant to subdivision (b), the civil penalty of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) assessed pursuant to that subdivision, notwithstanding Section 22953, shall be deposited into the Cigarette and Tobacco Products Compliance Fund established pursuant to Section 22990.
 Moneys from that civil penalty deposited into this fund shall be made available to the State Board of Equalization, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purposes of meeting its duties under subdivision (b).

(2) The department shall, upon request, provide to the State Board of Equalization information concerning any person, firm, or corporation that has been assessed a civil penalty for violation of the STAKE Act pursuant to this section when the department has notified the State Board of Equalization of the violation.

(d) The enforcing agency shall assess penalties pursuant to the schedule set forth in subdivision (a) against a person, firm, or corporation that sells, offers for sale, or distributes tobacco products from a cigarette or tobacco products vending machine,
 or a person, firm, or corporation that leases, furnishes, or services these machines in violation of Section 22960.

(e) An enforcing agency may assess civil penalties against a person, firm, or corporation that sells or deals in tobacco or any preparation thereof, and fails to post conspicuously and keep posted in the place of business at each point of purchase the notice required pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 22952. The civil penalty shall be in the amount of two hundred dollars ($200) for the first offense and five hundred dollars ($500) for each additional violation.

(f) An enforcing agency shall assess penalties in accordance with the schedule set forth in subdivision (a) against a person, firm, or corporation that advertises or causes to be advertised a tobacco product
 on an outdoor billboard in violation of Section 22961.

(g) If a civil penalty has been assessed pursuant to this section against a person, firm, or corporation for a single, specific violation of this division, the person, firm, or corporation shall not be prosecuted under Section 308 of the Penal Code for a violation based on the same facts or specific incident for which the civil penalty was assessed. If a person, firm, or corporation has been prosecuted for a single, specific violation of Section 308 of the Penal Code, the person, firm, or corporation shall not be assessed a civil penalty under this section based on the same facts or specific incident upon which the prosecution under Section 308 of the Penal Code was based.

(h) (1) In the case of a corporation or
 business with more than one retail location, to determine the number of accumulated violations for purposes of the penalty schedule set forth in subdivision (a), violations of this division by one retail location shall not be accumulated against other retail locations of that same corporation or business.

(2) In the case of a retail location that operates pursuant to a franchise as defined in Section 20001, violations of this division accumulated and assessed against a prior owner of a single franchise location shall not be accumulated against a new owner of the same single franchise location for purposes of the penalty schedule set forth in subdivision (a).

(i) Proceedings under this section shall be conducted pursuant to Section 131071 of the Health and Safety Code, except in
 cases where a civil penalty is assessed by an enforcing agency other than the department, in which case proceedings shall be conducted pursuant to the procedures of that agency that are consistent with Section 131071 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 462, Sec. 3.   (SB 1230)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

22959.

(a) The sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) shall be transferred annually from the portion of the federal Substance Abuse Prevention and Treatment block grant moneys allocated to the State Department of Health Care Services for administrative purposes related to substance abuse programs, to the Sale of Tobacco to Minors Control Account.

(b) Upon appropriation by the Legislature, moneys in the Sale of Tobacco to Minors Control Account shall be expended by the state department to administer and enforce this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 22, Sec. 4.   (AB 75)   Effective June 27, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 110 of Ch. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

22960.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), no cigarette or tobacco product shall be sold, offered for sale, or distributed from a vending machine or appliance, or any other coin or token operated mechanical device designed or used for vending purposes, including, but not limited to, machines or devices that use remote control locking mechanisms.

(b) (1) Commencing January 1, 1996, cigarette or tobacco product vending machines or appliances may be located at least 15 feet away from the entrance of a premise issued an on-sale public premises license as defined in Section 23039 by the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control to sell alcoholic beverages.

(2) As used in this subdivision “at least 15 feet away from the entrance” means within the premises of the licensed establishment and not outside those premises.

(c) This section and subdivision (b) of Section 22958 set forth minimum state restrictions on the sale of cigarettes or tobacco products from vending machines or devices and do not preempt or otherwise prohibit the adoption of a local standard that further restricts access to and reduces the availability of cigarette or tobacco products from vending machines or devices or that imposes a complete ban on the sale of cigarettes or tobacco products from vending machines or devices. A local standard that further restricts or imposes a complete ban on the sale of cigarettes or tobacco products from vending machines or devices shall control in the event of an inconsistency between this section and a local standard.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 823, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

22961.

(a) No person, firm, corporation, partnership, or other organization shall advertise or cause to be advertised any tobacco products on any outdoor billboard located within 1,000 feet of any public or private elementary school, junior high school, or high school, or public playground.

(b) This section sets forth minimum state restrictions on the advertisement of any tobacco products on outdoor billboards near schools and public playgrounds and does not preempt or otherwise prohibit the adoption of a local standard that imposes a more restrictive or complete ban on billboard advertising or on tobacco-related billboard advertising. A local standard that imposes a more restrictive or complete ban on billboard advertising or on tobacco-related billboard advertising shall control in the event of any inconsistency between this section and a local standard.

(c) This section shall not be construed to prohibit the display of a message or advertisement opposing the use of tobacco products. However, this subdivision shall not be construed to permit an advertisement promoting the use of tobacco products by including a message opposing the use of tobacco products within that advertisement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 219, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

22962.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Self-service display” means the open display of tobacco products or tobacco paraphernalia in a manner that is accessible to the general public without the assistance of the retailer or employee of the retailer.

(2) “Tobacco paraphernalia” means cigarette papers or wrappers, blunt wraps as defined in Section 308 of the Penal Code, pipes, holders of smoking materials of all types, cigarette rolling machines, or other instruments or things designed for the smoking or ingestion of tobacco products.

(3) “Tobacco product” means a product or device as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 22950.5 of the Business and Professions Code.

(4) “Tobacco store” means a retail business that meets all of the following requirements:

(A) Primarily sells tobacco products.

(B) Generates more than 60 percent of its gross revenues annually from the sale of tobacco products and tobacco paraphernalia.

(C) Does not permit any person under 18 years of age to be present or enter the premises at any time, unless accompanied by the person’s parent or legal guardian, as defined in Section 6903 of the Family Code.

(D) Does not sell alcoholic
 beverages or food for consumption on the premises.

(b) (1) (A) Except as permitted in subdivision (b) of Section 22960, it is unlawful for a person engaged in the retail sale of tobacco products to sell, offer for sale, or display for sale any tobacco product or tobacco paraphernalia by self-service display. A person who violates this section is subject to those civil penalties specified in the schedule in subdivision (a) of Section 22958.

(B) A person who violates this section is subject to those civil penalties specified in the schedule in subdivision (a) of Section 22958.

(2) It is unlawful for a person engaged in the retail sale of blunt wraps to place or maintain, or to cause to be placed or maintained, any blunt wraps advertising display within two feet of candy,
 snack, or nonalcoholic beverage displayed inside any store or business.

(3) It is unlawful for any person or business to place or maintain, or cause to be placed or maintained, any blunt wrap advertising display that is less than four feet above the floor.

(c) Subdivision (b) shall not apply to the display in a tobacco store of cigars, pipe tobacco, snuff, chewing tobacco, or dipping tobacco, provided that in the case of cigars they are generally not sold or offered for sale in a sealed package of the manufacturer or importer containing less than six cigars. In any enforcement action brought pursuant to this division, the retail business that displays any of the items described in this subdivision in a self-service display shall have the burden of proving that it qualifies for the exemption established in this subdivision.

(d) The Attorney General, a city attorney, a county counsel, or a district attorney may bring a civil action to enforce this section.

(e) This section does not preempt or otherwise prohibit the adoption of a local standard that imposes greater restrictions on the access to tobacco products than the restrictions imposed by this section. To the extent that there is an inconsistency between this section and a local standard that imposes greater restrictions on the access to tobacco products, the greater restriction on the access to tobacco products in the local standard shall prevail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 7, Sec. 3.   (SB 5 2x)   Effective June 9, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

22963.

(a) The sale, distribution, or nonsale distribution of tobacco products directly or indirectly to any person under 21 years of age through the United States Postal Service or through any other public or private postal or package delivery service at locations, including, but not limited to, public mailboxes and mailbox stores, is prohibited.

(b) Any person selling or distributing, or engaging in the nonsale distribution of, tobacco products directly to a consumer in the state through the United States Postal Service or by any other public or private postal or package delivery service, including orders placed by mail, telephone, facsimile transmission, or the internet, shall comply
 with the following provisions:

(1) (A) Before enrolling a person as a customer, or distributing or selling, or engaging in the nonsale distribution of, the tobacco product through any of these means, the distributor or seller shall verify that the purchaser or recipient of the product is 21 years of age or older. The distributor or seller shall attempt to match the name, address, and date of birth provided by the customer to information contained in records in a database of individuals whose age has been verified to be 21 years or older by reference to an appropriate database of government records kept by the distributor, a direct marketing firm, or any other entity. In the case of a sale, the distributor or seller shall also verify that the billing address on the check or credit card offered for payment by the purchaser matches
 the address listed in the database.

(B) If the seller, distributor, or nonsale distributor, is unable to verify that the purchaser or recipient is 21 years of age or older pursuant to subparagraph (A), the seller, distributor, or nonsale distributor shall require the customer or recipient to submit an age-verification kit consisting of an attestation signed by the customer or recipient that the customer or recipient is 21 years of age or older and a copy of a valid form of government identification. For the purposes of this section, a valid form of government identification includes a driver’s license, state identification card, passport, an official naturalization or immigration document, such as a permanent resident card (commonly known as a “green card”) or an immigrant visa, or military identification. In the case of a sale, the
 distributor or seller shall also verify that the billing address on the check or credit card provided by the consumer matches the address listed in the form of government identification.

(2) In the case of a sale, the distributor or seller shall impose a two-carton minimum on each order of cigarettes, and shall require payment for the purchase of any tobacco product to be made by personal check of the purchaser or the purchaser’s credit card. No money order or cash payment shall be received or permitted. The distributor or seller shall submit to each credit card acquiring company with which it has credit card sales identification information in an appropriate form and format so that the words “tobacco product” may be printed in the purchaser’s credit card statement when a purchase of a tobacco product is made by credit card
 payment.
